Maryland, session 2025, SB0836.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–105.
(b) The State income tax rate for a [corporation is 8.25% of Maryland taxable
income] CORPORATION’S MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME IS:
(1) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2024,
BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, 8.25%;
(2) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2025,
BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2027, 7.75%;
(3) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026,
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0836*

SENATE BILL 836
BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028, 7.25%;
(4) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2027,
BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, 6.75%; AND
(5) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2028,
6.25%.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.